Maryland, session 2025, HB0038.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
4–147.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2025, AND EACH JULY 1 THEREAFTER, EACH
COUNTY BOARD SHALL SUBMIT A STUDENT RESIDENCY AND SCHOOL ZONES REPORT
TO THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING AND THE INTERAGENCY COMMISSION ON
SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION.
(B) (1) THE STUDENT RESIDENCY AND SCHOOL ZONES REPORT SHALL
INCLUDE:
(I) THE SCHOOL ZONE BOUNDARIES AND ATTENDANCE AREA
MAP; AND
(II) THE LOCATIONS OF EACH STUDENT’S RESIDENCE.
(2) THE REPORT MAY NOT INCLUDE ANY PERSONAL IDENTIFYING
INFORMATION OF ANY STUDENT.
(C) THE INTERAGENCY COMMISSION ON SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION SHALL
ADOPT REGULATIONS ESTABLISHING FORMATTING AND SUBMISSION
REQUIREMENTS FOR THE STUDENT RESIDENCY AND SCHOOL ZONES REPORT.
5–303.
[(l) The Interagency Commission may make an eligible enrollment deduction for
an adjacent school when calculating the maximum State construction allocation for a
project approved for State funding under subsection (d)(3)(ii) of this section only if the sum
of available seat count in all adjacent schools is 15% or more of the project school’s
enrollment.]
Article – Land Use
7–106.
A COUNTY’S ADEQUATE PUBLIC FACILITIES ORDINANCE MAY NOT RESTRICT
HOUSING DEVELOPMENT FOR MORE THAN 4 YEARS AFTER ENACTMENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.